lv_LV.aff
SFX x Y 51
SFX x  s   as   [j]s
SFX x  s   ai   [j]s
SFX x  s   ām   [j]s
SFX x  s   ās   [j]s
SFX x  gs  ģe   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģes  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģei  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģi   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģē   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģu   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģēm  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ģēs  [o]gs
SFX x  ks  ce   nieks
SFX x  ks  ces  nieks
SFX x  ks  cei  nieks
SFX x  ks  ci   nieks
SFX x  ks  cē   nieks
SFX x  ks  ču   nieks
SFX x  ks  cēm  nieks
SFX x  ks  cēs  nieks
SFX x  s  e   [flrst]s
SFX x  s  es  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ei  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ē   [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ēm  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ēs  [flrst]s
SFX x  s   e    [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   es   [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ei   [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ē    [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ēm   [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ēs   [aāeodt][nr]s
SFX x  ns  ņu    [^ē]ns
SFX x  is  e    [ķlnprt]is
SFX x  is  es   [ķlnprt]is
SFX x  is  ei   [ķlnprt]is
SFX x  is  ē    [ķlnprt]is
SFX x  is  ēm   [ķlnprt]is
SFX x  is  ēs   [ķlnprt]is
SFX x e es e
SFX x e em e
SFX x e i  e
SFX x e ē  e
SFX x e ēm e
SFX x e ēs e
SFX x a as a
SFX x a am a
SFX x a u  a
SFX x a ā  a
SFX x a ām a
SFX x a ās a

SFX P Y 24
SFX P   is    a      [^bcdlmnpvtsz]is
SFX P   is    ja     [bpmv]is
SFX P   cis   ča     [c]is
SFX P   dis   ža     [d]is
SFX P   sis   ša     [s]is
SFX P   tis   ša     [^as][t]is
SFX P   is    a      [a][t]is
SFX P   is    a      [s][t]is
SFX P   zis   ža     [z]is
SFX P   nis   ņa     [^lsz][n]is
SFX P   lis   ļa     [^lsz][l]is
SFX P   lnis  ļņa    [l]nis
SFX P   snis  šņa    [s]nis
SFX P   znis  žņa    [z]nis
SFX P   llis  ļļa    [l]lis
SFX P   nnis  ņņa    [n]nis
SFX P   slis  šļa    [s]lis
SFX P   zlis  žļa    [z]lis
SFX P   s     m      [i]s
SFX P   s     0      [i]s
SFX P   is    ī      [i]s
SFX P   s     im     [lns]s
SFX P   s     i      [lns]s
SFX P   s     ī      [lns]s

SFX j Y 95
SFX j   is    ji     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    i      [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   ši     [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    i      [a][t]is
SFX j   is    i      [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   či     [c]is
SFX j   dis   ži     [d]is
SFX j   zis   ži     [z]is
SFX j   sis   ši     [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņi     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļi     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņi    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņi    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņi    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļi    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņi    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļi    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļi    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņi     [n]s
SFX j   is    ju     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    u      [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šu     [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    u      [a][t]is
SFX j   is    u      [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   ču     [c]is
SFX j   dis   žu     [d]is
SFX j   zis   žu     [z]is
SFX j   sis   šu     [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņu     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļu     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņu    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņu    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņu    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļu    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņu    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļu    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļu    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņu     [n]s
SFX j   is    jiem   [bpmv]is
SFX j   s     em     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šiem   [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    iem    [a][t]is
SFX j   is    iem    [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   čiem   [c]is
SFX j   dis   žiem   [d]is
SFX j   zis   žiem   [z]is
SFX j   sis   šiem   [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņiem   [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļiem   [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņiem  [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņiem  [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņiem  [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļiem  [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņiem  [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļiem  [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļiem  [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņiem   [n]s
SFX j   is    jus    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    us     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šus    [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    us     [a][t]is
SFX j   is    us     [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   čus    [c]is
SFX j   dis   žus    [d]is
SFX j   zis   žus    [z]is
SFX j   sis   šus    [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņus    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļus    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņus   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņus   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņus   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļus   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņus   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļus   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļus   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņus    [n]s
SFX j   is    jos    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    os     [ģrķj]is
SFX j   tis   šos    [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    os     [a][t]is
SFX j   is    os     [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   čos    [c]is
SFX j   dis   žos    [d]is
SFX j   zis   žos    [z]is
SFX j   sis   šos    [s]is
SFX j   nis   ņos    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ļos    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ļņos   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  šņos   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  žņos   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ļļos   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  ņņos   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  šļos   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  žļos   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    ņos    [n]s

SFX u Y 6
SFX u   is     ītis  [i]s
SFX u   is     īša   [i]s
SFX u   is     ītim  [i]s
SFX u   is     īti   [i]s
SFX u   is     ītī   [i]s
SFX u   is     īt    [i]s

SFX w Y 5
SFX w   is     īši   [i]s
SFX w   is     īšu   [i]s
SFX w   is     īšiem [i]s
SFX w   is     īšus  [i]s
SFX w   is     īšos  [i]s




SFX S Y 12
SFX S  0   s   [ae]
SFX S  0   i   [ae]
SFX S  a   u    a
SFX S  a   ā    a
SFX S  e   i    e
SFX S  e   ē    e
SFX S  s   ij  [^u]s
SFX S  s   i   [^u]s
SFX S  s   ī   [^u]s
SFX S  s   m   [u]s
SFX S  s   0   [u]s
SFX S  us  ū   [u]s




SFX m Y 67
SFX m  a     ām    a
SFX m  a     ās    a
SFX m  as    ām    [a]s
SFX m  as    ās    [a]s
SFX m  as    u     [a]s
SFX m  e     u    [^bcdlmnpstvz]e
SFX m  e     ju   [bmpv]e
SFX m  ce    ču   [c]e
SFX m  de    žu   [d]e
SFX m  le    ļu   [^l]le
SFX m  lle   ļļu  [l]le
SFX m  ne    ņu   [^lsz][n]e
SFX m  lne   ļņu  [l]ne
SFX m  sne   šņu  [s]ne
SFX m  zne   žņu  [z]ne
SFX m  se    šu   [s]e
SFX m  te    šu   [^s]te
SFX m  te    tu   [^k]ste
SFX m  ste   šu   [k]ste
SFX m  ze    žu   [z]e
SFX m  e     ēm   [e]
SFX m  e     ēs   [e]
SFX m  es      u   [^bcdlmnpstvz]es
SFX m  es     ju   [bmpv]es
SFX m  ces    ču   [c]es
SFX m  des    žu   [d]es
SFX m  les    ļu   [^l]les
SFX m  lles   ļļu  [l]les
SFX m  nes    ņu   [^sz][n]es
SFX m  lnes   ļņu  [l]nes
SFX m  snes   šņu  [s]nes
SFX m  znes   žņu  [z]nes
SFX m  ses    šu   [s]es
SFX m  tes    šu   [^s]tes
SFX m  tes    tu   [^k]stes
SFX m  stes   šu   [k]stes
SFX m  zes    žu   [z]es
SFX m  es     ēm   [e]s
SFX m  es     ēs   [e]s
SFX m  s     is   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     u    [^aeiudlntsvz]s
SFX m  ds    žu   [d]s
SFX m  ls    ļu   [l]s
SFX m  ns    ņu   [^s]ns
SFX m  sns   šņu  [s]ns
SFX m  s     ju   [v]s
SFX m  zs    žu   [z]s
SFX m  s     īm   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     īs   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     u    [s]s
SFX m  ts    šu   [^āīurs]ts
SFX m  ts    tu   [āīurs]ts
SFX m  is     u    [^dlntsvz]is
SFX m  dis    žu   [d]is
SFX m  lis    ļu   [l]is
SFX m  nis    ņu   [^s]nis
SFX m  snis   šņu  [s]nis
SFX m  is     ju   [v]is
SFX m  zis    žu   [z]is
SFX m  is     īm   [i]s
SFX m  is     īs   [i]s
SFX m  is     u    [s]is
SFX m  tis    šu   [^āīurs]tis
SFX m  tis    tu   [āīurs]tis
SFX m  us    i     [u]s
SFX m  us    iem   [u]s
SFX m  us    os    [u]s


SFX s Y 30
SFX s  a     iņa   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iņas  [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iņai  [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iņu   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iņā   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iņ    [^gk]a
SFX s  ga    dziņa   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziņas  [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziņai  [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziņu   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziņā   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziņ    [g]a
SFX s  ka    ciņa   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciņas  [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciņai  [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciņu   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciņā   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciņ    [^s]ka
SFX s  a     iņa     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iņas    [s]ka
SFX s  a     iņai    [s]ka
SFX s  a     iņu     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iņā     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iņ     [s]ka
SFX s  e     īt    [e]
SFX s  e     īte   [e]
SFX s  e     ītes  [e]
SFX s  e     ītei  [e]
SFX s  e     īti   [e]
SFX s  e     ītē   [e]


SFX f Y 11
SFX f  a   iņām    [^gk]a
SFX f  a   iņās    [^gk]a
SFX f  ga  dziņām   [g]a
SFX f  ga  dziņās   [g]a
SFX f  ka  ciņām   [^s]ka
SFX f  ka  ciņās   [^s]ka
SFX f  a   iņām    [s]ka
SFX f  a   iņās    [s]ka
SFX f  e   īšu     [e]
SFX f  e   ītēm    [e]
SFX f  e   ītēs    [e]
